Missouri, session 2026, SB1249.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.100, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 590.100,
to read as follows:
590.100. 1. The director shall have cause to deny any
application for a peace officer license or entrance into a
basic training course when the director has knowledge that
would constitute cause to discipline the applicant if the
applicant were licensed.
2. The director shall have cause to deny any
application for a peace officer license or entrance into a
basic training course when the applicant had a peace officer
license or certification that was revoked or surrendered.
3. The director shall have cause to deny any
application for a peace officer license or entrance into a
basic training course when the applicant is not a citizen of
the United States.
4. When the director has knowledge of cause to deny an
application pursuant to this section, the director may grant
the application subject to probation or may deny the
application. The director shall notify the applicant in
writing of the reasons for such action and of the right to
appeal pursuant to this section.
[3.] 5. Any applicant aggrieved by a decision of the
director pursuant to this section may appeal within thirty
1

days to the administrative hearing commission, which shall
conduct a hearing to determine whether the director has
cause for denial, and which shall issue findings of fact and
conclusions of law on the matter. The administrative
hearing commission shall not consider the relative severity
of the cause for denial or any rehabilitation of the
applicant or otherwise impinge upon the discretion of the
director to determine whether to grant the application
subject to probation or deny the application when cause
exists pursuant to this section. Failure to submit a
written request for a hearing to the administrative hearing
commission within thirty days after a decision of the
director pursuant to this section shall constitute a waiver
of the right to appeal such decision.
[4.] 6. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that cause for denial exists, the director shall
not be bound by any prior action on the matter and shall,
within thirty days, hold a hearing to determine whether to
grant the application subject to probation or deny the
application. If the licensee fails to appear at the
director's hearing, this shall constitute a waiver of the
right to such hearing.
[5.] 7. The provisions of chapter 621 and any
amendments thereto, except those provisions or amendments
that are in conflict with this chapter, shall apply to and
govern the proceedings of the administrative hearing
commission pursuant to this section and the rights and
duties of the parties involved.
2